Massachusetts, session 194th, H1887.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1. Section 26 of Chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding 
after subsection (b)(2)(i) the following subsections:- 
(A) Upon transferring permanent legal custody to a parent, the court shall determine 
whether or not jurisdiction in the juvenile proceeding should be terminated. 
(B) When the court transfers custody to a parent under this section, the court shall either 
cause the order to be filed in an existing civil action relating to the custody of the juvenile in the 
probate and family court or, if there is no other civil action, instruct the clerk to treat the order as 
the initiation of a civil action for custody. 
The order shall resolve any pending claim for custody in the probate and family court and 
shall constitute a modification of any custody order previously entered in the action. 
If the court’s order initiates a civil action in the probate and family court, the probate and 
family court shall designate the parties to the action and determine the most appropriate caption 

of 2 13 for the case. The civil filing fee is waived unless the probate and family court orders one or more 
of the parties to pay the filing fee for a civil action. The order shall constitute a custody 
determination, and any motion to enforce or modify the custody order shall be filed in the newly 
created civil action in the probate and family court in accordance with the provisions of Chapters 
208 or 209C. The Administrative Office of the Courts may adopt rules and shall develop and 
make available appropriate forms for establishing a civil file to implement this section. 
(C) When entering an order under this section, the court shall satisfy the following: 
(1) Make findings and conclusions that support the entry of a custody order in an action 
under Chapter 208 or 209C or, if the child is already the subject of a custody order entered 
pursuant to Chapter 208 or 209C, makes findings and conclusions that support modification of 
that order. 
(2) Make a finding that there is not a need for continued State intervention on behalf of 
the child through a juvenile court proceeding. 
Section 2. Section 26 of Chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting 
after the first sentence in subsection (c) the following sentence:- 
When permanent custody of the child is transferred to a parent and entered as an order in 
a probate and family court action in accordance with subparagraphs (2)(i)(A-C) of this section, 
the parties respective rights to review and redetermination shall end.